Utah statutes.
73-4-13.   In case of contest -- Notice of hearing.

If any contest or objection on the part of any claimant shall have been filed, as in this chapter provided, the court shall give not less than 15 days' notice to all claimants, stating when and where the matter will be heard.



No Change Since 1953

